Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 3

Vocational Services to the Blind — Home Industries Program

71-4-301. Use of appropriation for home industries.

The appropriation heretofore made by chapter 119 of the Public Acts of 1945 for the use and benefit of the department of human services shall be expended by the department for the purchase of raw materials and supplies to be used by blind persons in this state in home industries.

The director of services for the blind of the department has jurisdiction, under the supervision of the commissioner of human services, of the expenditure and repayment of such funds.

Despite any law to the contrary, purchases of such material by the director of services for the blind may be made without the necessity of taking bids for the purchases, advertisement for such bids or other restrictions now governing the purchases of materials generally on behalf of the state.

Acts 1945, ch. 119, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.79 (Williams, § 4765.78); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-614, 14-14-201.

71-4-302. Bond of director — Liability.

The director of services for the blind shall be required to execute bond for the faithful accounting for and distribution of the funds coming into the director's hands under this part. The bond shall be in such sum as may be fixed by the commissioner of human services, with the approval of the governor, the payments for the bond to be made from such revolving fund.

Any person having a claim against the director for an alleged mispayment or nonpayment of the proceeds of sale under this part shall have a right of action against such director under the bond required by subsection (a).

Acts 1945, ch. 119, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.79 (Williams, § 4765.78); impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 2 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-615, 14-14-202.

71-4-303. Application for purchase of materials.

Any blind person desiring that materials and supplies for home industries be purchased for such person's benefit shall make application to the director of services for the blind stating the materials desired, the finished product that it is proposed to make and form, the probable cost of the finished product, and the probable sale price of the finished product to be fabricated from such materials.

Each such application shall likewise contain an express covenant on the part of such person to repay to the fund the amount furnished by it for the purchase of materials and supplies for the person's benefit, and also shall contain an express covenant on the person's part to deliver to the director all the finished products so made from such materials or so much of such materials and supplies furnished and not used.

Acts 1945, ch. 119, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.79 (Williams, § 4765.78); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-616, 14-14-203.

71-4-304. Denial of application for materials.

The director of services for the blind may, at the director's discretion, decline to purchase material and supplies for any blind person under this part, whenever and if information available to such director indicates that there is a probability that the amount of such purchase will not be repaid to the state, that the blind person in question possesses sufficient financial ability to purchase such raw materials, that through intermingling of goods the raw materials and supplies purchased with advances from this fund or the finished product may not be satisfactorily identified to such an extent that a contract repayment may be enforced by identifying the finished product.

Acts 1945, ch. 119, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.79 (Williams, § 4765.78); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-617, 14-14-204.

71-4-305. Sale of products — Distribution of proceeds.

All finished products made from raw material and supplies purchased with the proceeds of advances under this part shall be detailed to the director of services for the blind at such times and places as the director may designate.

Upon receipt of such finished articles, the director, with the approval of the commissioner, shall proceed to sell them in such manner and in such method, either singly or collectively, as will net the highest price. In case of a collective sale, the proceeds shall be ratably apportioned, when several blind persons contributed finished products, in proportion to the amount of such finished products made by each.

Out of the proceeds of the sale of any finished product made by any blind person, the director of services for the blind shall repay to the revolving fund the amount of the advances made from it to the maker of such finished products and shall pay the remainder of the proceeds of such sale to such blind person.

The director shall not be permitted to make or deduct any charges for the director's services in negotiating such sale.

Acts 1945, ch. 119, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.79 (Williams, § 4765.78); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-618, 14-14-205.